src/fst/stems/prepositions.lexc
LEXICON Preposition
etter p ;
på p ;
i p ;
med p ;
for p ;
bak p ;
av p ;
til p ;
frå p ;
utan p ;
over p ;
under p ;
foran p ;
framfor p ;
attom p ;
ved p ;
or p ;
fram p ;
mellom p ;
 
LEXICON p
 +Pr: # ;
